Utah statutes.
54-4-30.   Acquiring properties of like utility only on consent of
commission.
Hereafter no public utility shall acquire by lease, purchase or otherwise the
plants, facilities, equipment or properties of any other public utility
engaged in the same general line of business in this state, without the
consent and approval of the Public Service Commission. Such consent shall be
given only after investigation and hearing and finding that said purchase,
lease or acquisition of said plants, equipment, facilities and properties will
be in the public interest.
